Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-604.01
Birth certificate; sex reassignment; new certificate; procedure.

Upon receipt of a notarized affidavit from the physician that performed sex reassignment surgery on an individual born in this state and a certified copy of an order of a court of competent jurisdiction changing the name of such person, the department shall prepare a new certificate of birth in the new name and sex of such person in substantially the same form as that used for other live births. The evidence from which the new certificate is prepared and the original certificate of birth shall be available for inspection only upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1994, LB 886, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 515;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 404.